src/myspell/hyph_en_US.dic
.noethe1r2i3a4
.noetheri2a2n
.no8o8r8d9w8i8j8k8e8r9h8o8u8t.
.noo2
.no3ord
.noord1w
.noordwi2
.noordwi3j
.noordwijk1er
.noordwijker1h4
.noordwijkerhou2
.no9v8e8m9b8e8r.
.nove4m5b
.op8e8n9b8s8d.
.ope4n1b4
.open2b5s2
.openb4s5d
.op8e8n9o8f8f8i8c8e.
.op4eno
.openo4f1f
.openof1fi
.op8e8n9o8Ô¨?c8e.
.pa8l8a9t8i8n8o.
.pala2t1in
.palat2i1no
.pa9l8e8r9m8o.
.paler3m4
.paler1mo
.pe9t8r8o8v9s8k8i.
.petro3v
.petrovsk2
.petrovsk1i
.pf8a8f8f9i8a8n.
.4pf
.p1fa
.pfa2f
.pfa4f1f4
.pfaf1fi
.pfaff2i3a
.pfaffi2a2n
.pf8a8Ô¨?a8n.
.pfaÔ¨Éa2n
.ph8i8l9a9d8e8l9p8h8i8a.
.phi4l4ade
.phila2d
.philade2lp
.philadel5phi
.philadelph2i1a
.ph8i8l9o9s8o8p8h9i9s8c8h8e.
.philo2so
.philos4op
.philos2oph
.philosoph2is1c
.philosophis3ch2
.philosophische2
.po8i8n9c8a8r8e.
.poin2
.poi2
.poinc2a2r5
.poin1ca
.po9t8e8n9t8i8a8l9g8l8e8i9c8h8u8n8g.
.p4ot
.po1ten1t
.potent2i
.poten1t2i1a
.potenti2al
.potentia4l1g4
.potentialgl2
.potential1gle
.potentialglei2
.potentialgle5ic
.potentialgle4i2ch
.ra9d8h8a9k8r8i8s8h9n8a8n.
.rad1h2
.radhakr2is
.radhakr3is2h
.radhakris2h1n
.radhakrish1na
.radhakrishn2a2n
.ra8t8h8s9k8e8l9l8e8r.
.r4ath
.ra2t4h1s2
.rathsk2
.rath4ske
.rathskel1l
.rathskel2le
.ri8e9m8a8n8n9i8a8n.
.r2ie4
.rie5ma2n
.rie1ma
.riema4n1n2
.rieman3n4i1a
.riema2nni3a2n
.ry8d9b8e8r8g.
.ry1d
.ryd1b
.rydberg2
.sc8h8o8t9t8i8s8c8h8e.
.scho4t3t2
.schott2is1c
.s2ch2ottis3ch2
.schottische2
.sc8h8r8o9d8i8n8g9e8r.
.sc4hr4
.schrod1in
.schrod4inge
.sc8h8w8a9b8a9c8h8e8r.
.sch1w
.s2chwaba2ch
.schwabache2
.sc8h8w8a8r8z9s8c8h8i8l8d.
.schw2a2r
.s2ch2warzs2ch2
.schwarzsch4il2
.schwarzschi2ld
.se8p9t8e8m9b8e8r.
.se2p1t
.sep2te
.septe4m5b
.st8o8k8e8s9s8c8h8e.
.st2ok
.stokes4
.stok2e2ss
.stokes2s5c
.stokess2ch2
.stokessche2
.st8u8t8t9g8a8r8t.
.stu4t3t2
.stut4t1g
.stutt1ga
.stuttg2a2r
.su8s9q8u8e9h8a8n9n8a.
.s2us
.susqu2
.susque1h4
.susqueha2n
.susqueha4n1n2
.susquehan1na
.ta8u9b8e8r9i8a8n.
.tau4b
.taub4e
.tau3ber
.tauber1i
.taube1r2i3a4
.tauberi2a2n
.te8c8h9n8i9s8c8h8e.
.te2ch
.tec2h1n
.techn2is1c
.te2chnis3ch2
.technische2
.te8n9n8e8s9s8e8e.
.t4e4n1n2
.tenne4
.ten1nes
.tenn2e2ss
.to9m8a9s8z8e8w9s8k8i.
.to2ma
.tomas2ze
.tomaszewsk2
.tomaszewsk1i
.ty9p8o9g8r8a8p8h8i8q8u8e.
.ty3po
.ty5po4g
.typo1gr
.typogr4aphi
.typographiqu2
.uk8r8a8i8n9i8a8n.
.4uk
.ukr2ai2
.ukra4i4n
.ukra2ini
.ukrai4n4i1a
.ukraini3a2n
.ve8r9a8l8l9g8e9m8e8i8n9e8r8t8e.
.veral1l
.veral4l1g4
.verallge1me
.verallgemei2
.verallgeme2ine
.verallgemein1er
.ve8r9e8i8n9i9g8u8n8g.
.vere3in
.verei2
.vere2ini
.verein2ig
.vereini3gun
.ve8r9t8e8i9l8u8n9g8e8n.
.vertei2
.verteilun1gen
.vi8i8i8t8h.
.v4i5i4
.v4i5i5i4
.vii2ith
.vi8i8t8h.
.vi2ith
.wa8h8r9s8c8h8e8i8n9l8i8c8h9k8e8i8t8s9t8h8e8o9r8i8e.
.wa4hr4
.wah4rs2
.wahrs4c
.wahrs2ch2
.wahrsche2
.wahrschei2
.wahrsche4i4n1l
.wahrs2cheinl4i2ch
.wahrscheinlic4hk
.wahrschei2nlichkei2
.wahrscheinlichkei4t1s2
.wahrscheinlichkeits3th2e
.wahrscheinlichkeitsthe1o5r
.wahrscheinlichkeitstheor2ie4
.we8r9n8e8r.
.w1er
.wer4n1er
.we8r9t8h8e8r9i8a8n.
.werth2e
.werther1i
.werthe1r2i3a4
.wertheri2a2n
.wi8n9c8h8e8s9t8e8r.
.win2ch
.winche2
.winch1es
.wi8r8t9s8c8h8a8f8t.
.w4ir4
.wir4t1s2
.wirt4sc
.wirts2ch2
.wirtscha2f
.wirtscha2ft
.wi8s9s8e8n9s8c8h8a8f8t9l8i8c8h.
.w4i2s1s
.wissen4
.wisse2n1s2
.wissens4c
.wissens2ch2
.wissenscha2f
.wissenscha2ft
.wissenschaf2tl
.wissens2chaftl4i2ch
.xv8i8i8i8t8h.
.xv4i5i4
.xv4i5i5i4
.xvii2ith
.xv8i8i8t8h.
.xvi2ith
.xx8i8i8i8r8d.
.xx4
.xx3i
.xx4i5i4
.xx4i5i5i4
.xxii4ir
.xx8i8i8n8d.
.xxi4ind
.yi8n8g9y8o8n8g.
.y1i
.yin2gy
.yingy1o4
.yingyo2n
.sh8u9x8u8e.
.shux1u3
.ji9s8u8a8n.
.ji2su
.jisua2n
.ze8a9l8a8n8d.
.2ze
.zea4l
.zea3l4and
.zeala2n
.ze8i8t9s8c8h8r8i8f8t.
.zei2
.zei4t1s2
.zeit4sc
.zeits2ch2
.zeitsc4hr4
.zeitschr4i2ft
.aÔ¨Én9i1ty
.aÔ¨Én2it
.aÔ¨Én9ity's
.daÔ¨?est
.daÔ¨Ée
.de9Ô¨?ance
.deÔ¨?a
.deÔ¨?a2n
.deÔ¨Åanc
.de9Ô¨?ance's
.de9Ô¨?an4t
.de9Ô¨?ant1ly
.deÔ¨Åan2tl
.deÔ¨Åc8i4t1s2
.de4Ô¨Åc
.d5eÔ¨?ci
.deÔ¨?c1it
.de9Ô¨Ål9ing
.deÔ¨Ål4
.deÔ¨Ål1i
.Ô¨?anc√©
.Ô¨?a
.Ô¨?a2n
.Ô¨Åanc
.Ô¨?anc√©'s
.Ô¨?anc√©e
.Ô¨?anc√©es
.Ô¨?anc√©s
.Ô¨Ål9i9buster
.Ô¨Ål1i
.Ô¨Ål2ib
.Ô¨Åli5bust
.Ô¨Ålib2us
.Ô¨Ål9i9buster's
.Ô¨Ål9i9bus9te2r2ed
.Ô¨Ålibus5tere
.Ô¨Ål9i9bus9ter9in4g
.Ô¨Ålibus1ter1i
.Ô¨Ål9i9buste4r1s2
.Ô¨Ål9i9gree
.Ô¨Ål2ig
.Ô¨Åli5gre
.Ô¨Åli1gr
.Ô¨Ål9i9gree's
.Ô¨Ål9i9greed
.Ô¨Ål9i9gree9ing
.Ô¨Åligreei2
.Ô¨Ål9i9gree2s4
.Ô¨Ån8der
.Ô¨Ånd
.Ô¨Ån1de
.Ô¨Ån8der's
.Ô¨Ånd9e4r5s2
.Ô¨Ån8n1er
.Ô¨?n1n2
.Ô¨Ånne4
.Ô¨Ån8ni4er
.Ô¨Ånn2ie4
.Ô¨Ån8ni9est
.Ô¨Ås8ticuÔ¨Ä3s
.Ô¨Ås1t2i
.Ô¨Ås1tic
.Ô¨Åst4ic1u
.Ô¨Åstic4u4Ô¨Ä
.Ô¨ÇuÔ¨?est
.Ô¨ÇuÔ¨Ée
.Ô¨Çy9lea2f
.Ô¨Çy
.Ô¨Çyle2a
.Ô¨Çy9leaf's
.Ô¨Çy9leav4e2s
.Ô¨Çylea2v
.Ô¨Çy9sheet
.Ô¨Çys4
.Ô¨Çys2h
.Ô¨Çy9speck1
.Ô¨Çyspe2c
.Ô¨Çy9speck's
.Ô¨Çy9speck2ed
.Ô¨Çy9speck9in4g
.Ô¨Çyspeck3i
.Ô¨Çy9spec4k1s2
.Ô¨Çy9swat9ter
.Ô¨Çysw2
.Ô¨Çyswat5te
.Ô¨Çyswa4t3t2
.Ô¨Çy9swat9te4r1s2
.huÔ¨?est
.huÔ¨Ée
.iÔ¨?est
.iÔ¨Ée
.puÔ¨?est
.puÔ¨Ée
.re9Ô¨Ål9ing
.re3Ô¨
.reÔ¨Ål4
.reÔ¨Ål1i
.scruÔ¨?est
.scruÔ¨Ée
.spiÔ¨?est
.spiÔ¨Ée
.stuÔ¨?est
.stuÔ¨Ée
.viewÔ¨Ån8der
.v2ie4
.view1Ô¨
.view2Ô¨Ån
.viewÔ¨Ånd
.viewÔ¨Ån1de
.viewÔ¨Ån8der's
.viewÔ¨Ånd9e4r5s2
.aÔ¨Én9ityÔ¨És
.de9Ô¨?anceÔ¨És
.Ô¨?anc√©Ô¨És
.Ô¨Ål9i9busterÔ¨És
.Ô¨Ål9i9greeÔ¨És
.Ô¨Ån8derÔ¨És
.Ô¨Çy9leafÔ¨És
.Ô¨Çy9speckÔ¨És
.viewÔ¨Ån8derÔ¨És
